Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.341

General obligation bond retirement fund—Appropriations of 34th legislature to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of April, 1955, all appropriations made by the thirty-fourth legislature from the general obligation bond retirement fund shall be paid out of moneys in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.341. Prior: 1955 c 330 s 2.]